Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2428
Formal testacy proceedings; written objections to probate.

Any party to a formal proceeding who opposes the probate of a will for any reason shall state in his pleadings his objections to probate of the will.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 106, UPC § 3-404.